Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
EDUCATION
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Billion Seven Hundred Four
Million Three Hundred Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($1,704,307,500.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for the
financial support of public schools.
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($7,500,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for
the financial support of public schools.
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Education Reform Revolving Fund, created in Section 34.89 of Title
62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of One Billion Three Hundred
Two Million Four Hundred Ten Thousand Eight Hundred Twenty-three
Dollars ($1,302,410,823.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary
for the financial support of public schools.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 3

SECTION 4. The State Board of Education is hereby authorized to
expend during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the Common
Education Technology Revolving Fund of the State Treasury, the sum
of Forty-seven Million Dollars ($47,000,000.00) or so much thereof
as may be necessary for the financial support of public schools.
SECTION 5. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Mineral Leasing Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Million Seven Hundred Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($4,750,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary for the financial support of public schools.
SECTION 6. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Mineral Leasing Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Three Hundred Fifty-nine Thousand
Six Hundred Six Dollars ($359,606.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary for the financial support of public schools.
SECTION 7. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the State Treasury for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Twenty-seven Million
Seven Hundred Eighty-seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($27,787,500.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for the
financial support of public schools.
SECTION 8. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the State Treasury for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of One Million Four
Hundred Sixty-two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,462,500.00) or
so much thereof as may be necessary for the financial support of
public schools.
SECTION 9. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Hundred Forty Million Eighty-
eight Thousand Six Hundred Seven Dollars ($140,088,607.00) or so
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 4

much thereof as may be necessary for the support of public school
activities.
SECTION 10. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Hundred Twenty Million Five
Hundred Ninety-seven Thousand Seven Hundred Twenty Dollars
($420,597,720.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for the
certified employee flexible benefit allowance.
SECTION 11. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Hundred Sixty-one Million Seven
Hundred Thousand Eight Hundred Seventy-four Dollars
($261,700,874.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for the
support personnel flexible benefit allowance.
SECTION 12. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Eighteen Million Two Hundred
Ninety-seven Thousand Seven Hundred Thirty-four Dollars
($18,297,734.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for
administrative and support functions of the State Department of
Education.
SECTION 13. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Forty-five Million One Hundred
Ninety Thousand Dollars ($45,190,000.00) or so much thereof as may
be necessary for the purchase of textbooks and instructional
materials.
SECTION 14. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the State Treasury for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Three Million Eighty-
seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,087,500.00) or so much
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 5

thereof as may be necessary for transfer to the School Consolidation
Assistance Fund.
SECTION 15. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the State Treasury for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of One Hundred Sixty-two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($162,500.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary for transfer to the School Consolidation Assistance
Fund.
SECTION 16. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the State Treasury for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Three Million Eighty-
seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,087,500.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary for transfer to the Teachers’ Retirement
System Dedicated Revenue Revolving Fund.
SECTION 17. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the State Treasury for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of One Hundred Sixty-two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($162,500.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary for transfer to the Teachers’ Retirement System
Dedicated Revenue Revolving Fund.
SECTION 18. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Million Six Hundred Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($2,650,000.00) for the purpose of compensating
student teachers as defined by Section 1-116 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 19. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education for deposit in the State Public Common School Building
Equalization Fund, created in Section 32 of Article X of the
Oklahoma Constitution, from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Hundred Twenty-five
Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00) to be distributed as redbud school
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 6

grants as provided in Section 3-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 20. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Six Million Five Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($6,500,000.00) to be transferred to the Public School Paid
Maternity Leave Revolving Fund (294) pursuant to the provisions of
Section 6-104.8 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 21. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Fifty Million Dollars
($50,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for transfer
to the School Security Revolving Fund.
SECTION 22. There is hereby appropriated to the Strong Readers
Revolving Fund, established in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1778 of the
2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Forty-
three Million Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($43,750,000.00)
or so much thereof as may be necessary to carry out the provisions
of the Strong Readers Act.
SECTION 23. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the State
Board of Education is hereby authorized to transfer from the
Teachers’ Retirement System Dedicated Revenue Revolving Fund to the
Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma, the sum of Four Hundred
Fifty-four Million Six Hundred Ninety-seven Thousand Four Hundred
Eight Dollars ($454,697,408.00) and from the funds appropriated in
Sections 16 and 17 of this act, in the amounts provided in those
sections for the purposes prescribed in Section 34.93 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 24. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Arts
Council from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, the sum of Four Million Twenty Thousand Five Hundred Two
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 7

Dollars ($4,020,502.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Oklahoma Arts Council by law.
SECTION 25. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Career and Technology Education from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Hundred Eighty-
one Million Six Hundred Eighty-seven Thousand Nine Hundred Four
Dollars ($181,687,904.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the State Board of Career and
Technology Education by law.
SECTION 26. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Career and Technology Education from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the
State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of
Three Million Three Hundred Ninety-six Thousand Two Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($3,396,250.00) pursuant to Section 713 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes for allocation by the State Board of Career and
Technology Education for the education and general operating budgets
of the institutions and for other programs, construction,
renovations, or repairs administered by the State Board of Career
and Technology Education.
SECTION 27. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Career and Technology Education from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the
State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of
One Hundred Seventy-eight Thousand Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars
($178,750.00) pursuant to Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma
Statutes for allocation by the State Board of Career and Technology
Education for the education and general operating budgets of the
institutions and for other programs, construction, renovations, or
repairs administered by the State Board of Career and Technology
Education.
SECTION 28. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of
Educational Quality and Accountability from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Three Million
Ninety-nine Thousand Three Hundred Nine Dollars ($3,099,309.00) or
so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 8

upon the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability by law.
Of those funds appropriated, the sum of Sixty Thousand Dollars
($60,000.00) shall be deposited in the Teaching Certification
Scholarship Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section 6-187C of
Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Of those funds appropriated, the
sum of One Hundred Eighty Thousand Dollars ($180,000.00) shall be
deposited in the Education Leadership Oklahoma Revolving Fund,
created pursuant to Section 6-204.3 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 29. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Educational Television Authority from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Million Eight
Hundred Forty-two Thousand Six Hundred Twenty-three Dollars
($2,842,623.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Oklahoma Educational Television
Authority by law.
SECTION 30. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Eight Hundred
Seventy-eight Million Nine Hundred Twenty-three Thousand Nine
Hundred Eighty-one Dollars ($878,923,981.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary for allocation by the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education pursuant to the provisions of Article XIII-a of the
Oklahoma Constitution for the education and general operating
budgets of the institutions and for other programs, construction,
renovations, or repairs administered by the Oklahoma State Regents
for Higher Education. Of those funds appropriated, the sum of Three
Million One Hundred Forty-nine Thousand Eight Hundred Ninety-seven
Dollars ($3,149,897.00) shall be transferred to the Oklahoma Tuition
Equalization Grant Trust Fund to implement the provisions of the
Oklahoma Tuition Equalization Grant Act, and the sum of Twelve
Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($12,500,000.00) shall be
transferred to the Oklahoma National Guard Educational Assistance
Revolving Fund, created in Section 3232 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 31. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services is
authorized to transfer to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 9

Education during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, an amount of
Eighty Million Dollars ($80,000,000.00) designated for the support
of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program.
SECTION 32. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education are
hereby authorized to expend during the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, the sum of Forty-seven Million Dollars ($47,000,000.00) from
the Higher Education Capital Revolving Fund of the State Treasury
for allocation by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education
pursuant to the provisions of Article XIII-a of the Oklahoma
Constitution for the education and general operating budgets of the
institutions and for other programs, construction, renovations, or
repairs administered by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
SECTION 33. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education are
hereby authorized to expend during the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, the sum of Forty-seven Million Dollars ($47,000,000.00) from
the Oklahoma Student Aid Revolving Fund of the State Treasury for
allocation by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education
pursuant to the provisions of Article XIII-a of the Oklahoma
Constitution for the education and general operating budgets of the
institutions and for other programs, construction, renovations, or
repairs administered by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
SECTION 34. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the
State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of
Twenty-four Million Three Hundred Ninety-one Thousand Two Hundred
Fifty Dollars ($24,391,250.00) pursuant to Section 713 of Title 3A
of the Oklahoma Statutes for allocation by the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education pursuant to the provisions of Article
XIII-a of the Oklahoma Constitution for construction, renovations,
or repairs administered by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education or for any other purpose authorized by Section 713 of
Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 35. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 10

State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of
One Million Two Hundred Eighty-three Thousand Seven Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($1,283,750.00) pursuant to Section 713 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes for allocation by the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education pursuant to the provisions of Article XIII-a of the
Oklahoma Constitution for construction, renovations, or repairs
administered by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education or
for any other purpose authorized by Section 713 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 36. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Eighteen Million
Eight Hundred Twenty-two Thousand Six Hundred Fifteen Dollars
($18,822,615.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for
expenditures for concurrent enrollment pursuant to Section 628.13 of
Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 37. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Million Two
Hundred Thirty-two Thousand Nine Hundred Seventy-four Dollars
($4,232,974.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for the
general operating budget of the administrative offices of the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
SECTION 38. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Twelve Million Five
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($12,500,000.00) for the purpose of
purchasing casualty and property insurance.
SECTION 39. There is hereby appropriated to the Commissioners
of the Land Office from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the Commissioners of the Land Office Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Six Million Five
Hundred Fourteen Thousand Nine Hundred Thirty-two Dollars
($6,514,932.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Commissioners of the Land Office by law.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 11

SECTION 40. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Libraries from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Five Million Five Hundred
Sixty-five Thousand Four Hundred Sixty-one Dollars ($5,565,461.00)
or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the Oklahoma Department of Libraries by law.
SECTION 41. There is hereby appropriated to the Health Care
Workforce Training Commission from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Ten Million Four
Hundred Forty-six Thousand Four Hundred Thirty-three Dollars
($10,446,433.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Health Care Workforce Training
Commission by law. Of the funds appropriated in this section, the
sum of Two Million Three Hundred Twenty Thousand Dollars
($2,320,000.00) shall be used to carry out the provisions of Section
3308.1 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 42. There is hereby appropriated to the Board of
Trustees of the Oklahoma School of Science and Mathematics from any
monies not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of
the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum
of Seven Million Two Hundred One Thousand Nine Hundred Eighty-six
Dollars ($7,201,986.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Board of Trustees of the
Oklahoma School of Science and Mathematics by law.
SECTION 43. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Center
for the Advancement of Science and Technology from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of
Seventeen Million Two Hundred Eighty-seven Thousand Five Hundred
Twenty Dollars ($17,287,520.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Oklahoma Center for
the Advancement of Science and Technology by law. Of those funds
appropriated, the sum of Eight Million Two Hundred Twenty-eight
Thousand One Hundred Thirty-six Dollars ($8,228,136.00) shall be
deposited in the Research Support Revolving Fund, created pursuant
to Section 5060.11 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, provided
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 12

that Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) shall be dedicated to
applied research and development for industry innovation. Of those
funds appropriated, Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00)
shall be dedicated to the Research and Development Attraction
Program, created pursuant to Section 5003.10g of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. Of those funds appropriated, the sum of One
Million Two Hundred Thirty-one Thousand Four Hundred Nineteen
Dollars ($1,231,419.00) shall be deposited in the Seed-capital
Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section 5060.21 of Title 74 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 44. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Board
of Private Vocational Schools from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Hundred Fifty-
two Thousand One Hundred Fifty-six Dollars ($252,156.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Oklahoma Board of Private Vocational Schools by law.
SECTION 45. There is hereby appropriated to the Statewide
Charter School Board Revolving Fund, created in Section 3-132.3 of
Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, from the General Revenue Fund of
the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum
of Six Million Seven Hundred Four Thousand One Hundred Fifty-six
Dollars ($6,704,156.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Statewide Charter School Board
by law.
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
SECTION 46. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the
State Auditor and Inspector from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Million Five
Hundred Sixty-four Thousand Eight Hundred Ninety-three Dollars
($4,564,893.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Office by law.
SECTION 47. There is hereby appropriated to the State Election
Board from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2025, the sum of Thirteen Million One Hundred Sixty-five
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 13

Thousand Nine Hundred Forty-three Dollars ($13,165,943.00) or so
much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon
the Board by law.
SECTION 48. There is hereby appropriated to the State Election
Board Voting System Revolving Fund created in Section 3-107.3 of
Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Twelve Million
Dollars ($12,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the State Election Board by law.
SECTION 49. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Emergency Management from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Million Four
Hundred Eighty Thousand Four Hundred Eighty-two Dollars
($1,480,482.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 50. There is hereby appropriated to the Ethics
Commission from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Million Four Hundred Three
Thousand Three Hundred Twenty-three Dollars ($1,403,323.00) or so
much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon
the Commission by law.
SECTION 51. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the
Governor from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, the sum of Three Million Four Hundred Sixty-four Thousand
Six Hundred Twenty-seven Dollars ($3,464,627.00) or so much thereof
as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Office of
the Governor by law.
SECTION 52. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma House
of Representatives from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Twenty-two Million Eighty-seven
Thousand Six Hundred Ninety-five Dollars ($22,087,695.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to pay the salaries, per diem, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 14

expenses of the members of the Oklahoma House of Representatives,
the salaries of the employees of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, and other necessary expenses. Claims and payrolls
filed against the appropriation made to the Oklahoma House of
Representatives for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be
approved by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives.
SECTION 53. There is hereby appropriated to the Legislative
Service Bureau from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Twenty-two Million Four Hundred
Ninety-eight Thousand Four Hundred Eighty-eight Dollars
($22,498,488.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Legislative Service Bureau by law.
SECTION 54. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the
Lieutenant Governor from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Six Hundred Ninety-six Thousand
Four Hundred Thirty-nine Dollars ($696,439.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Office by
law.
SECTION 55. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Special Cash Fund of the State Treasury, the
sum of One Hundred Twenty-nine Million Seven Hundred Twelve Thousand
Nine Hundred Three Dollars ($129,712,903.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services by law. Of the funds
appropriated in this section, the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall transfer the sum of Seventy-five Thousand
Dollars ($75,000.00) to the Volunteer Firefighter Group Insurance
Pool Revolving Fund, created by Section 85.71 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 56. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Public Building Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Million Four
Hundred Forty-six Thousand Eight Hundred Twenty Dollars
($2,446,820.00) to be transferred to the Building and Facility
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 15

Revolving Fund, created by Section 63.1 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, for the purpose of maintaining state buildings operated by
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
SECTION 57. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Public Building Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of One Million Forty-
eight Thousand Fifty-one Dollars ($1,048,051.00) to be transferred
to the Building and Facility Revolving Fund, created by Section 63.1
of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for the purpose of maintaining
state buildings operated by the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services.
SECTION 58. There is hereby appropriated to Service Oklahoma
from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury, the sum of Fifty-two Million Thirty-
three Thousand Nine Hundred Eighty-three Dollars ($52,033,983.00) or
so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon Service Oklahoma by law.
SECTION 59. There is hereby appropriated to the Military
Department of the State of Oklahoma from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Twenty-two Million
Nine Hundred Thirty-four Thousand Two Hundred Seventy-seven Dollars
($22,934,277.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 60. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Senate from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2025, the sum of Twelve Million Two Hundred Thirty-seven
Thousand One Hundred Four Dollars ($12,237,104.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to pay monthly salaries, per diem, and
expenses of the members of the Oklahoma State Senate and the
salaries of the Secretary of the Senate and employees, and such
contingent expenses as may be ordered paid therefrom including the
preparation and printing of the journals and calendars of the
Oklahoma State Senate and including the preparation and printing of
the permanent journals thereof; and for expenses of personal
services, including retirement and insurance costs, including those
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 16

of members and employees of the Oklahoma State Senate, and expenses
of maintenance and operation including travel expenses, supplies,
materials, printing, equipment, and printing of permanent journals,
and for the renovation and modification of the Oklahoma State Senate
area as required.
SECTION 61. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Tax
Commission from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Special Cash Fund of the State Treasury, the sum of Twenty-nine
Million Four Hundred Forty-four Thousand Two Hundred Thirty-five
Dollars ($29,444,235.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Commission by law.
SECTION 62. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the
State Treasurer from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Million Eight Hundred Sixty-six
Thousand Four Hundred Twelve Dollars ($2,866,412.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Office by law.
TRANSPORTATION
SECTION 63. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of
Fifteen Million Four Hundred Eighteen Thousand Two Hundred Eighty
Dollars ($15,418,280.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 64. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Space
Industry Development Authority from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Eight Million Four
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($8,400,000.00) or so much thereof as may
be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Authority by
law. The monies appropriated in this section shall be transferred
to the Oklahoma Space Industry Development Authority Revolving Fund,
created in Section 518 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 17

SECTION 65. The Department of Transportation is hereby
authorized to expend during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
from the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund of the
State Treasury, the sum of Six Hundred Ten Million Dollars
($610,000,000.00) to be budgeted and expended in accordance with
law.
SECTION 66. The Department of Transportation is hereby
authorized to expend during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
from the State Transportation Fund of the State Treasury, the sum of
One Hundred Ninety-six Million Two Hundred Thousand Two Hundred
Eighty-one Dollars ($196,200,281.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department of
Transportation by law. Of the authorization, One Hundred Eighty-two
Million Four Hundred Thousand Two Hundred Eighty-one Dollars
($182,400,281.00) shall be transferred to the State Highway
Construction and Maintenance Fund and shall be expended in the same
manner and for the same purposes as provided by law for other monies
accruing to the credit of the State Highway Construction and
Maintenance Fund, and Thirteen Million Eight Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($13,800,000.00) shall be authorized for transfer to the
Public Transit Revolving Fund of the State Treasury.
SECTION 67. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Transportation from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Twenty-five Million Two Hundred
Ninety-three Thousand Three Hundred Twenty-four Dollars
($25,293,324.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law. Of the funds
appropriated in this section, Fifteen Million Dollars
($15,000,000.00) shall be used to improve access to industrial areas
experiencing major developments and lake and waterway access.
PUBLIC HEALTH
SECTION 68. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Health
Care Authority from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Billion Two Hundred Sixty-nine
Million Five Hundred Twenty-seven Thousand Eighty-nine Dollars
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 18

($1,269,527,089.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Authority by law.
SECTION 69. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Health
Care Authority from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Ninety-nine Million Dollars
($99,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Authority by law.
SECTION 70. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Health
Care Authority from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Health Care Enhancement Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Ninety-nine Million Four
Hundred Ninety-four Thousand Four Hundred Fifty Dollars
($99,494,450.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Authority by law.
SECTION 71. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Health
Care Authority from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Tobacco Settlement Fund of the State Treasury, the sum of Ten
Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Authority by law.
SECTION 72. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Health
Care Authority from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Rate Preservation Fund of the State Treasury, the sum of One Hundred
Eighty Million Three Hundred Thirty-nine Thousand Two Hundred Thirty
Dollars ($180,339,230.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Authority by law.
SECTION 73. There is hereby appropriated to the State
Department of Health from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Sixty-eight Million Three Hundred
Forty-eight Thousand Five Hundred Fifty-eight Dollars
($68,348,558.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law. Of the funds
appropriated in this section, the sum of Eighteen Million Dollars
($18,000,000.00) shall be transferred to the Choosing Childbirth
Revolving Fund, created in Section 1-740.20 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 19

SECTION 74. There is hereby appropriated to the State
Department of Health from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Thirty Million Dollars
($30,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law. Of the funds
appropriated in this section, the sum of Ten Million Dollars
($10,000,000.00) shall be transferred to the Oklahoma Rural Health
Transformation Revolving Fund (ORHT Revolving Fund), created in
Enrolled House Bill No. 4040 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature.
SECTION 75. There is hereby appropriated to the J.D. McCarty
Center for Children with Developmental Disabilities from any monies
not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the
State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of
Four Million One Hundred Twenty-eight Thousand Nine Hundred Fifty-
three Dollars ($4,128,953.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary
to perform the duties imposed upon the Center by law.
SECTION 76. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Medical Marijuana Authority from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Special Cash Fund of the State Treasury, the
sum of Thirty-six Million Nine Hundred Five Thousand Four Hundred
Seventy-seven Dollars ($36,905,477.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Authority by law.
SECTION 77. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Three
Hundred Eighty-five Million Four Hundred Ninety Thousand Eight
Hundred Fifty-one Dollars ($385,490,851.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department
by law. Of the funds appropriated herein, Four Million Five Hundred
Thirty-two Thousand Five Hundred Seventy-three Dollars
($4,532,573.00) shall be transferred to the Mental Health Transport
Revolving Fund (247), created in Section 1-110.1 of Title 43A of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and the sum of Twelve Million Five Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($12,500,000.00) shall be transferred to the County
Community Safety Investment Fund, created in Section 2-312.1 of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 20

Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, which shall be distributed
according to Section 2-312.4 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 78. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of
Seventy-two Million Eight Hundred Thirty Thousand Five Hundred
Forty-two Dollars ($72,830,542.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 79. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Fund of
the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum
of Twelve Million One Hundred Eighty-five Thousand Six Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($12,185,650.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 80. There is hereby appropriated to the University
Hospitals Authority from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Hundred Eighty-two Million One
Hundred Seventy-six Thousand One Hundred Eighty-three Dollars
($182,176,183.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Authority by law. Of the funds
appropriated in this section, the University Hospitals Authority
shall use the sum of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) to
provide funding for the Institute for the American Constitutional
Heritage at the University of Oklahoma.
SECTION 81. There is hereby appropriated to the University
Hospitals Authority from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Eighty Million Ninety-one Thousand
Two Hundred Fifty-four Dollars ($80,091,254.00) or so much thereof
as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Authority
by law.
SECTION 82. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
University Medical Authority from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 21

the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Ninety Million
Eight Hundred Forty-eight Thousand One Hundred Eighty-nine Dollars
($90,848,189.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Authority by law.
SECTION 83. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Veterans Affairs from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Thirty-seven
Million Three Hundred Seventy-four Thousand Seventy Dollars
($37,374,070.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
HUMAN SERVICES
SECTION 84. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Commission on Children and Youth from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Three Million
Seventeen Thousand Five Hundred Seventy-four Dollars ($3,017,574.00)
or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the Commission by law.
SECTION 85. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of
Disability Concerns from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Three Hundred Eighteen Thousand
Nine Hundred Seventy-nine Dollars ($318,979.00) or so much thereof
as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Office by
law.
SECTION 86. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Human Services from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Eight Hundred Thirty-five Million
Two Hundred Nineteen Thousand Five Hundred Forty-four Dollars
($835,219,544.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law. Of the funds
appropriated in this section, the Department of Human Services shall
transfer the sum of One Hundred Fifty-eight Million Two Hundred
Seventy-one Thousand Seven Hundred Twelve Dollars ($158,271,712.00)
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 22

to the Developmental Disability Services Revolving Fund, created in
Section 1026.1 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 87. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Human Services from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Sixty-five Million Dollars
($65,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law. Of the funds
appropriated in this section, the Department of Human Services shall
transfer the sum of Forty-five Million Dollars ($45,000,000.00) to
the Developmental Disability Services Revolving Fund, created in
Section 1026.1 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 88. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of
Juvenile Affairs from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Hundred Six Million Two Hundred
Fifty-nine Thousand Six Hundred Four Dollars ($106,259,604.00) or so
much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon
the Office by law.
SECTION 89. There is hereby appropriated to the State
Department of Rehabilitation Services from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Forty-one Million
Four Hundred Ninety-three Thousand Eight Hundred Five Dollars
($41,493,805.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
NATURAL RESOURCES
SECTION 90. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Fifty-
six Million One Hundred Thirty-nine Thousand One Hundred Seventy-
nine Dollars ($56,139,179.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary
to perform the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 91. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry from any monies not
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 23

otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Five
Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Department by law. Of the funds appropriated herein, Four Million
Dollars ($4,000,000.00) shall be transferred to the Rural Fire Fund
(245), and the sum of One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars
($1,500,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to provide
curriculum materials and instruction on the April 19, 1995, Alfred
P. Murrah Federal Building bombing to students in this state.
SECTION 92. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
University Veterinary Medicine Authority from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of
Thirty-seven Million Eight Hundred One Thousand Five Hundred Thirty-
two Dollars ($37,801,532.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary
to perform the duties imposed upon the Authority by law.
SECTION 93. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Forty-six Million Ninety-seven
Thousand Four Hundred Ninety-three Dollars ($46,097,493.00) or so
much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon
the Department by law. Of the funds appropriated in this section,
the sum of Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) shall be
transferred to the Olympics in Oklahoma Revolving Fund, created in
Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1378 of the 2nd Session of the 60th
Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 94. There is hereby appropriated to the Rural Economic
Action Plan Fund from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Thirty-three Million Dollars
($33,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to implement
the provisions of Sections 2006 through 2013 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 95. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Conservation Commission from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 24

year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Thirty-six Million Five
Hundred Forty-one Thousand Three Hundred Three Dollars
($36,541,303.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Commission by law. Of the funds
appropriated in this section, the sum of Eight Million Eighty
Thousand Dollars ($8,080,000.00) shall be transferred to the North
Canadian Watershed Restoration Revolving Fund, created in Section 3-
8-103 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 96. There is hereby appropriated to the Corporation
Commission from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Eighteen Million Three Hundred
Sixty-four Thousand Nine Hundred Thirty-three Dollars
($18,364,933.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Commission by law.
SECTION 97. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Environmental Quality from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Nineteen Million Six Hundred
Seventy-one Thousand Ten Dollars ($19,671,010.00) or so much thereof
as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Department by law.
SECTION 98. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Biosolids Land Application Research Pilot Program Act Revolving
Fund, created in Enrolled House Bill No. 3403 of the 2nd Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Two Million Dollars
($2,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of the Oklahoma Biosolids Land Application Research
Pilot Program Act by law.
SECTION 99. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Historical Society from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Fifteen Million Six Hundred Eleven
Thousand Four Hundred Thirty-nine Dollars ($15,611,439.00) or so
much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon
the Oklahoma Historical Society by law.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 25

SECTION 100. There is hereby appropriated to the J.M. Davis
Memorial Commission from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Hundred Ninety-one Thousand
Six Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($491,625.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Commission
by law.
SECTION 101. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Labor from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, the sum of One Million Seven Hundred Twenty-eight Thousand
Nine Hundred Thirteen Dollars ($1,728,913.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department
by law.
SECTION 102. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Labor from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the Special
Occupational Health and Safety Fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2025, the sum of Four Hundred Eighty-four Thousand Nine Hundred
Sixty-one Dollars ($484,961.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 103. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Labor from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the Special
Occupational Health and Safety Fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, the sum of One Million Seventy-three Thousand Seven
Hundred Seventy-one Dollars ($1,073,771.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department
by law.
SECTION 104. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Mines from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, the sum of One Million Two Hundred Eighty-four Thousand
Eighty-four Dollars ($1,284,084.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 105. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Tourism and Recreation Department from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 26

the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Twenty-five Million
One Hundred Eighty-six Thousand Seven Hundred Eighty-nine Dollars
($25,186,789.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 106. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Water
Resources Board from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Twenty-two Million Eight Hundred
Thirty Thousand Five Hundred Forty-two Dollars ($22,830,542.00) or
so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the Board by law.
SECTION 107. There is hereby appropriated to the Water and
Wastewater Infrastructure Investment Revolving Fund, created in
Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1176 of the 2nd Session of the 60th
Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the Statewide Recovery Fund (497) of the State Treasury, the
sum of Thirty-five Million Dollars ($35,000,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Oklahoma Water Resources Board by law.
SECTION 108. The Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall transfer monies from the appropriation
made to the Oklahoma Water Resources Board in Section 106 of this
act to the Rural Economic Action Plan Water Projects Fund (225),
created pursuant to Section 2002.1 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, in amounts and ratios requested by the agency for the
Rural Economic Action Plan program except that the cumulative
amounts transferred shall not exceed the cumulative amounts of equal
monthly allotments of the appropriation made to the Oklahoma Water
Resources Board.
SECTION 109. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Workforce Commission from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Hundred Ninety-six Thousand
Eight Hundred Fifty-one Dollars ($496,851.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Commission
by law.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 27

SECTION 110. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Athletic Commission from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Hundred Sixty-nine Thousand
Five Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($269,575.00) or so much thereof
as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Commission by law.
PUBLIC SAFETY
SECTION 111. There is hereby appropriated to the Alcoholic
Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Million Eight
Hundred Seventy-six Thousand Ninety Dollars ($4,876,090.00) or so
much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon
the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission by law.
SECTION 112. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Corrections from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Hundred Fifty-two Million One
Hundred Twenty-seven Thousand Four Hundred Ninety Dollars
($452,127,490.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department of Corrections by law.
SECTION 113. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Corrections from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Forty Million Dollars
($40,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department of Corrections by law.
SECTION 114. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Corrections from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Special Cash Fund of the State Treasury, the sum of Forty-four
Million Nine Hundred Three Thousand Four Hundred Two Dollars
($44,903,402.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department of Corrections by law.
SECTION 115. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation from any monies not otherwise appropriated
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 28

from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Thirty-eight Million Six
Hundred Seventy Thousand One Hundred Forty-nine Dollars
($38,670,149.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation
by law.
SECTION 116. There is hereby appropriated to the Council on Law
Enforcement Education and Training from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Seven Million Three
Hundred Seven Thousand Five Hundred Sixty-five Dollars
($7,307,565.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Council on Law Enforcement Education and
Training by law.
SECTION 117. There is hereby appropriated to the Council on Law
Enforcement Education and Training from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the CLEET Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, the sum of Two Million Two Hundred Thirty-two Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($2,232,500.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Council on Law
Enforcement Education and Training by law.
SECTION 118. There is hereby appropriated to the Council on Law
Enforcement Education and Training from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the CLEET Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, the sum of One Hundred Eighty-seven Thousand Three Hundred
Ninety-seven Dollars ($187,397.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Council on Law
Enforcement Education and Training by law.
SECTION 119. There is hereby appropriated to the Board of
Medicolegal Investigations from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Fifteen Million
Three Hundred Seventy-four Thousand Seventy-two Dollars
($15,374,072.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Board of Medicolegal Investigations by
law.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 29

SECTION 120. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum Two
Million Nine Hundred Twenty-eight Thousand Eight Hundred Sixty-five
Dollars ($2,928,865.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control by law.
SECTION 121. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Public Safety from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Hundred Two Million Eight
Hundred Thirty-four Thousand Eight Hundred Thirty-five Dollars
($102,834,835.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Department of Public Safety by law. Of
the funds appropriated herein, the Department of Public Safety is
authorized to transfer an amount not to exceed Twelve Million Two
Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($12,250,000.00) to the Department of
Public Safety Patrol Academy Revolving Fund, created by Section 2-
146 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 122. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Public Safety from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Public Safety Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, the sum of Twenty-four Million One Hundred Thirty
Thousand Dollars ($24,130,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department of
Public Safety by law.
SECTION 123. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Public Safety from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Public Safety Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2025, the sum of Two Million One Hundred Thirteen Thousand
Nine Hundred Thirty-eight Dollars ($2,113,938.00) or so much thereof
as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Department of Public Safety by law.
JUDICIARY
SECTION 124. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the
Attorney General from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 30

General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Twenty-six Million Two Hundred
Sixty-two Thousand Six Hundred Forty-four Dollars ($26,262,644.00)
or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the Office of the Attorney General by law.
SECTION 125. The Office of the Attorney General is authorized
to transfer an amount not to exceed Three Hundred Twenty Thousand
Four Hundred Thirty Dollars ($320,430.00) from the Attorney
General’s Evidence Fund (700), created by Section 19 of Title 74 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Attorney General’s Revolving Fund
(200), created by Section 20 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 126. There is hereby appropriated to the Domestic
Violence and Sexual Assault Services Revolving Fund, created in
Section 19.4 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies
not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the
State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of
Seventeen Million Dollars ($17,000,000.00) or so much as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 19.4 of Title 74 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 127. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the
Attorney General from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Million Five Hundred Nine
Thousand Three Hundred Seventy-eight Dollars ($1,509,378.00) to
transfer to the Legal Services Revolving Fund (250), created
pursuant to subsection G of Section 921.1 of Title 12 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 128. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Sheriff’s Office Funding Assistance Revolving Fund, created in
Section 20k-1B of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies
not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the
State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of
Eighteen Million Dollars ($18,000,000.00) to be budgeted and
expended in accordance with law.
SECTION 129. There is hereby appropriated to the Court of
Criminal Appeals from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 31

ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Four Million Five Hundred Sixty-
three Thousand Four Hundred Ninety-four Dollars ($4,563,494.00) or
so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the Court of Criminal Appeals by law.
SECTION 130. There is hereby appropriated to the District
Attorneys Council from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Eighty-seven Million Four Hundred
Sixteen Thousand Seven Hundred Forty-eight Dollars ($87,416,748.00)
or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the district attorneys and the District Attorneys Council by
law. Of the funds appropriated herein, the District Attorneys
Council shall transfer up to the sum of Four Hundred Ninety-one
Thousand Fourteen Dollars ($491,014.00) or so much thereof as may be
required by the district attorneys and the District Attorneys
Council to the District Attorneys Evidence Fund for necessary
expenses relative to any case within the official responsibility of
the offices of the district attorneys as provided by Section 215.40
of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Of the funds appropriated
herein, the District Attorneys Council shall transfer the sum of Two
Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be required to the Sexual Assault Examination Fund,
created by Section 142.20 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the
sum of Four Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,500,000.00) to
the District Attorney Locality Incentive Program Revolving Fund,
created in Enrolled House Bill No. 3981 of the 2nd Session of the
60th Oklahoma Legislature, and the sum of Two Million Five Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) to the Rural District Attorney Loan
Repayment Assistance Program Revolving Fund, created in Enrolled
House Bill No. 3980 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature.
SECTION 131. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, up to
Nine Hundred Thousand Dollars ($900,000.00) is authorized to be
transferred from the Crime Victims Compensation Revolving Fund,
created by Section 142.17 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to
the District Attorneys Council to support the Crime Victims
Compensation Board.
SECTION 132. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, up to
One Million Five Hundred One Thousand Three Hundred Seventy-five
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 32

Dollars ($1,501,375.00) is authorized to be transferred from the
Crime Victims Compensation Revolving Fund, created by Section 142.17
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the District Attorneys
Council for duties to support victim-witness services.
SECTION 133. The Supreme Court is hereby authorized to expend
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the State Judicial
Revolving Fund of the State Treasury, the sum of Fifteen Million
Five Hundred Thirty-seven Thousand Three Hundred Thirteen Dollars
($15,537,313.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for the
financial support of the district courts.
SECTION 134. There is hereby appropriated to the Supreme Court
from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue
Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
the sum of Seventy Million Four Hundred Fifty-four Thousand Five
Hundred Forty-five Dollars ($70,454,545.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the district
courts by law.
SECTION 135. REAPPROPRIATION AND REDESIGNATION. The amount of
Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) of the original appropriation of
Seventy-one Million Four Hundred Twenty-two Thousand Nine Hundred
Eighty-three Dollars ($71,422,983.00), appropriated to the Supreme
Court by Section 140 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the
performance of duties imposed upon the district courts by law, is
hereby reappropriated and redesignated for the performance of duties
imposed upon the district courts by law. If, on the date this act
is approved, any of the amount originally appropriated, as adjusted
by expenditures, encumbrances and transfers, results in an
unencumbered balance less than the reappropriated and redesignated
amount, that reappropriated and redesignated amount is reduced to
the unencumbered amount.
SECTION 136. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Indigent Defense System from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Twenty-five Million Seven
Hundred Ninety-five Thousand Nine Hundred Twenty-eight Dollars
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 33

($25,795,928.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the Oklahoma Indigent Defense System by law.
SECTION 137. There is hereby appropriated to the Pardon and
Parole Board from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Million Five Hundred Twenty-
five Thousand Seven Hundred Twenty-one Dollars ($2,525,721.00) or so
much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon
the Pardon and Parole Board by law.
SECTION 138. There is hereby appropriated to the Supreme Court
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Twenty-six Million Six Hundred
Twenty-five Thousand Eighty-six Dollars ($26,625,086.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Supreme Court or Court of Civil Appeals by law. Of the funds
appropriated herein, the Supreme Court is authorized to transfer up
to Ten Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($10,500,000.00) to the
Family Representation and Advocacy Program Revolving Fund, created
pursuant to Section 802 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to
implement the provisions of the Family Representation and Advocacy
Act.
SECTION 139. There is hereby appropriated to the Council on
Judicial Complaints from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two
Hundred Eighty-three Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($283,200.00) or
so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the Council on Judicial Complaints by law.
SECTION 140. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Sixty-two Million Ten Thousand One
Hundred Fifteen Dollars ($62,010,115.00) to be transferred to the Ad
Valorem Reimbursement Fund, created pursuant to Section 193 of Title
62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for the purpose of reimbursing counties
for school districts that claim a loss of revenue due to a tax
exemption granted pursuant to the provisions of Section 6B of
Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 34

SECTION 141. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Tax
Commission from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Fifteen Million Five Hundred Fifty-
four Thousand Seven Hundred Ninety-two Dollars ($15,554,792.00) to
be transferred to the Ad Valorem Reimbursement Fund, created
pursuant to Section 193 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for
the purpose of reimbursing counties that claim a loss of revenue due
to a tax exemption granted to veterans and their surviving spouses
pursuant to the provisions of Sections 8D, 8E, and 8F of Article X
of the Oklahoma Constitution.
SECTION 142. There is hereby appropriated to the Statewide
Charter School Board Revolving Fund, established pursuant to Section
3-132.3 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Three
Million Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,400,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the
Statewide Charter School Board by law.
SECTION 143. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of
Education from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Five Million Dollars
($5,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed upon the State Board of Education by law.
SECTION 144. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Forty-
nine Million Dollars ($49,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Department by law.
SECTION 145. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Human Services from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Twenty-two Million Dollars
($22,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform
the duties imposed on the Department by law.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 35

SECTION 146. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Human Services from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of One Million One Hundred Forty
Thousand Dollars ($1,140,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to implement the provisions of the Teacher Recruitment and
Retention Program created in Enrolled House Bill No. 2778 of the 1st
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 147. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma State
Athletic Commission from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars
($75,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the
duties imposed upon the Commission by law.
SECTION 148. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Unclaimed Property Fund (711), the sum of
Seventy-eight Million Nine Hundred Thousand Dollars ($78,900,000.00)
for availability of appropriation.
SECTION 149. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the State Insurance Commissioner Revolving Fund
(200), the sum of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) for
availability of appropriation.
SECTION 150. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Revolving Fund for the Office of the Secretary
of State (200), the sum of Eight Million Five Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($8,500,000.00) for availability of appropriation.
SECTION 151. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Medical Marijuana Tax Fund (205), the sum of
Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) for availability of
appropriation.
SECTION 152. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 36

appropriated from the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority Fund
(248), the sum of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) for
availability of appropriation.
SECTION 153. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Oklahoma Employment Security Commission
Information Technology Innovation Revolving Fund (269), the sum of
Two Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,100,000.00) for
availability of appropriation.
SECTION 154. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the State Fire Marshal Revolving Fund (200), the
sum of Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) for availability of
appropriation.
SECTION 155. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Oklahoma Tax Commission Fund (200), the sum of
Forty-seven Million Dollars ($47,000,000.00) for availability of
appropriation.
SECTION 156. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund (215), the
sum of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) for availability of
appropriation.
SECTION 157. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Capital Account Revolving Fund (245), the sum
of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) for availability of
appropriation.
SECTION 158. There is hereby appropriated to the Special Cash
Fund of the State Treasury from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Cash Flow Reserve Fund (090), the sum of
Seventy Million Dollars ($70,000,000.00) for availability of
appropriation.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 37

SECTION 159. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Quick
Action Closing Fund, created pursuant to Section 48.2 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the Special Cash Fund of the State Treasury, the sum of Twenty-
five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) to be budgeted and expended by
the Governor as authorized by law.
SECTION 160. There is hereby appropriated to The State
Emergency Fund, created pursuant to Section 139.42 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the Special Cash Fund of the State Treasury, the sum of Five
Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary for matching federal disaster funds and for other
disaster-related assistance.
SECTION 161. There is hereby appropriated to the Progressing
Rural Economic Prosperity Fund, created in Section 256 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Thirty-one Million Dollars
($31,000,000.00) for availability of appropriation.
SECTION 162. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Trump
Account Investment Fund, created in Enrolled House Bill No. 4071 of
the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies
not otherwise appropriated from the Special Cash Fund of the State
Treasury, the sum of Twelve Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars
($12,500,000.00) to carry out the provisions of the Oklahoma Dream
Accounts Investment Program Act.
SECTION 163. There is hereby appropriated to the Taxpayer
Endowment Trust Fund, created in Enrolled House Bill No. 4072 of the
2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the Revenue Stabilization Fund of the
State Treasury, the sum of Two Hundred Million Dollars
($200,000,000.00) to carry out the provisions of the Taxpayer
Endowment Trust Fund Act.
SECTION 164. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Opioid Abatement Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section 30.6 of
Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Opioid Lawsuit Settlement Fund (Fund 383) of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 38

the State Treasury, the sum of Twenty Million Dollars
($20,000,000.00) to be budgeted and expended in accordance with law.
SECTION 165. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Opioid Abatement Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section 30.6 of
Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Opioid Lawsuit Settlement Fund (Fund 383) of
the State Treasury, the sum of One Million Two Hundred Fifty-three
Thousand Six Hundred Fifty-eight Dollars ($1,253,658.00) to be
distributed to non-litigating subdivisions.
SECTION 166. Appropriations, authorizations, and distributions
directed in this act to or from a revolving fund of the State
Treasury enacted during the 1st Regular Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature shall be executable upon the later of the effective date
for such applicable section of this act or upon the date of such
fund’s creation.
SECTION 167. Sections 1 through 139 and Sections 148 through
165 of this act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 39

Passed the Senate the 7th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 9th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1177 Page 40